New York, session 2025-2026, S4530.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2855 of the public authorities law, as added by 2 section 1 of part KK of chapter 59 of the laws of 2006, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 2855. Electronic method of payment; periodic charges; exemptions. 5 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, if any 6 authority shall offer any electronic method of payment for tolls, fares, 7 fees, rentals, or other charges, including but not limited to a system 8 called E-ZPass, such authority shall not impose any periodic administra- 9 tive or other charge for the privilege of using such electronic method 10 of payment for such charges. Nothing in this section shall be construed 11 to prohibit any authority from making any charge for extra services 12 requested by a holder of such electronic method of payment, any charge 13 for lost or damaged equipment, or for defaults, such as charges for 14 dishonored checks. The authority shall not enter any agreement with 15 bondholders that would require the imposition of administrative or other 16 periodic charges relating to electronic methods of payment prohibited by 17 this section. 18 2. (a) Any authority shall exempt all members based on Fort Wadsworth 19 and Fort Hamilton military members in active military service of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08352-02-5 S. 4530--A 2 1 United States, from tolls and charges associated with the Verrazzano- 2 Narrows Bridge, as defined by section one of the military law, who 3 reside in a city with a population of one million or more using a New 4 York customer service E-ZPass account for travel within the state from 5 the payment of any tolls therefor; provided, however, that such 6 exemption shall not apply to trips made by vehicles that are used for 7 commercial purposes. Application for such toll exemption shall be made 8 in such manner as shall be prescribed by the New York E-ZPass customer 9 service center or successor entity and shall contain such information as 10 such entity may require. 11 (b) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall also 12 apply to spouses and dependent children of all Fort Wadsworth and Fort 13 Hamilton military members in active military service of the United 14 States who reside in a city with a population of one million or more, if 15 such family members reside in the same household as such military 16 members. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 19 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 20 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 21 on or before such effective date.